Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.060

Applications—Original and renewal certification, licensure, or registration—Reinstatement.

(1) Applications for examinations, original certification, licensure, or registration, renewal certification, licensure, or registration, and the reinstatement of a certificate, license, or registration must be made in writing to the department on forms approved by the director. Applications for original and renewal certification, licensure, or registration or the reinstatement of a certificate or license must include a statement confirming that the applicant is in compliance with applicable rules and regulations and that the applicant understands the penalties for misconduct.

(2) The appropriate fees must accompany all applications for examination, reexamination, original certification, licensure, or registration, renewal certification, licensure, or registration, and the reinstatement of a certificate or license.

[ 2019 c 51 s 2; 2005 c 339 s 5; 1993 c 30 s 6; 1989 c 414 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 51: See note following RCW 18.140.130.

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.